Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2163.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


This act shall be known and may be cited as “Kenny’s Law”.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-35 of Title 2, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this act:


1. “Gate” means a hinged, sliding, or otherwise movable barrier


used to control entry or exit through an opening in an enclosure,


fence, or wall;



Req. No. 3361 Page 1


2. “Livestock” means the same as defined in Section 1-3 of


Title 2 of the Oklahoma Statutes; and


3. “Maintenance” means the functional checking, servicing,


repairing, or replacing of necessary infrastructure conducted by the


property owner, utility company, municipality, or state or federal


agency.


B. All gates that are part of an enclosure or barrier designed


to contain livestock shall remain closed at all times, except when:


1. Ingress or egress is in progress; provided, that the ingress


or egress shall be reasonable and not prolonged as to allow persons


to enter and leave without causing containment of livestock to be


compromised;


2. Maintenance is occurring within the property;


3. Livestock are being moved from one area to another; or


4. The livestock owner, utility company, municipality, or any


state or federal agency has a functional reason to access the


enclosed area.


C. A person shall be in violation of this act if he or she


knowingly or maliciously:


1. Leaves a gate open that is part of an enclosure or barrier


designed to contain livestock on private or public property;


2. Damages any part of the gate that is part of an enclosure or


barrier designed to contain livestock, which compromises the


containment of livestock; or

Req. No. 3361 Page 2


3. Allows livestock to escape containment.


D. A person who violates the provisions of this act shall be


deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be


punishable by a fine not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00)


for each separate offense, imprisonment in a county jail for not


more than one hundred eighty (180) days for each separate offense,


or by both such fine and imprisonment, for the first and second


convictions. Third and subsequent convictions shall be punishable


by a fine not to exceed Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars


($2,500.00) for each separate offense, imprisonment in a county jail


for not more than one (1) year for each separate offense, or by both


such fine and imprisonment. A person who violates the provisions of


this section shall also incur all financial liability for damages


caused by the violation.


E. The State Board of Agriculture shall promulgate rules


necessary to implement the provisions of this act.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3361 YG 1/15/2026 2:07:56 PM











Req. No. 3361 Page 3